Utah statutes.
61-2-11.5.   Investigations.
(1)  The division may make any investigation within or outside of this state
as the division considers necessary to determine whether any person has
violated, is violating, or is about to violate this chapter or any rule or
order under this chapter.
(2)  To aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules
and forms under this chapter, the division may require or permit any person to
file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as to all facts and
circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated.
(3)  For the purpose of the investigation described in Subsection (1), the
division or any employee designated by the division may:
(a)  administer an oath or affirmation;
(b)  subpoena witnesses;
(c)  take evidence;
(d)  require the production of a book, paper, contract, record, other
document, or information relevant to the investigation; and
(e)  serve a subpoena by certified mail.
